Washington statutes.
RCW 24.40.070

Severability—1971 c 59.

If any provision of RCW 24.40.010 through 24.40.070 or the application thereof is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of RCW 24.40.010 through 24.40.070 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of RCW 24.40.010 through 24.40.070 are declared to be severable.

[ 1971 c 59 s 8.]